Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 11
ACTIONS ORIGINATING IN OTHER
JURISDICTIONS

Section

14-11-101. Foreign decrees - how handled.

Upon the docketing in a court of competent jurisdiction in this state of exemplified copies of all the written pleadings and court orders, judgments, and decrees in a case of divorce, separate maintenance, or annulment, or for support of minor children or a spouse, or for a protection order or other court order issued for the protection of a party or parties, or for a combination of the same entered in any court of competent jurisdiction in any other state or jurisdiction having reciprocal provisions for a like enforcement of orders, judgments, or decrees entered in the state of Colorado and upon obtaining jurisdiction by personal service of process as provided by the Colorado rules of civil procedure, said court in this state shall have jurisdiction over the subject matter and of the person in like manner as if the original suit or action had been commenced in this state, and is empowered to amend, modify, set aside, and make new orders as the court may find necessary and proper so as to do justice and equity to all parties to the action according to the public policy of this state, and has the same right, power, and authority to enter orders for temporary alimony, support money, and attorney fees as in similar actions originating in this state.

The courts of this state in cases of dissolution of marriage, legal separation, or declaration of invalidity of marriage, or for support of minor children or a spouse, or for the protection of a party or parties by means of a protection order, however styled or designated, or for any combination of the same, where the action originated in this state, have the power to enforce the decrees, judgments, and orders of other states or jurisdictions made pursuant to statutes similar to this statute, or to amend the same, or to enter new orders to the same extent and in the same manner as though such decrees, judgments, and orders were entered in the courts of this state.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, a restraining or protection order issued by a court of any state, any Indian tribe, or any United States territory shall be enforced pursuant to section 13-14-110, C.R.S.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this article, a child-custody determination, as that term is defined in section 14-13-102 (3), issued by a court of another state shall be registered in accordance with section 14-13-305.

Source:

L. 47:

pp. 398, 399, §§ 1, 2.

CSA:

C. 56, § 39.

CRS 53:

§ 46-4-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-4-1.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 210, § 26, effective July 16.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 2034, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 98:

(3) added, p. 1235, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2000:

(4) added, p. 1538, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1012, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 765, § 23, effective June 1.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1259), ch. 218, p. 1016, § 18, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For procedure in pleading a foreign judgment or decree, see C.R.C.P. 9(e); for enforcement of foreign judgments, see article 53 of title 13; for the "Uniform Child-custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act", see article 13 of this title 14; for enforcement of support orders from another state or foreign country, see the "Uniform Interstate Family Support Act", article 5 of this title 14.